Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-224.01
Reinsurance, merger, consolidation;
terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-224.01 to 44-224.10,
unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance or his or her authorized
representative;

(2) Policyholders shall mean the members of mutual insurance companies,
the members of assessment associations, and the subscribers to reciprocal
insurance exchanges;

(3) Merger or contract of merger shall mean a merger or consolidation
agreement between stock insurance companies as authorized by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act;

(4) Consolidation or contract of consolidation shall mean a merger or
consolidation agreement between companies operating on other than the stock
plan of insurance; and

(5) Bulk reinsurance or contract of bulk reinsurance shall mean an agreement
whereby one company cedes by an assumption reinsurance agreement fifty percent
or more of its risks and business to another company.

Laws 1957, c. 180, § 1, p. 620;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 10, p. 1271;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 72;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 218;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 284.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.